dictionaries/sr_Cyrl/src/sr.aff
FLAG num
SFX 735 Y 16
SFX 735 дија ђанин
SFX 735 дија ђанина
SFX 735 дија ђанину
SFX 735 дија ђанине
SFX 735 дија ђанином
SFX 735 дија ђани
SFX 735 дија ђана
SFX 735 дија ђанима
SFX 735 дија ђане
SFX 735 дија ђанка
SFX 735 дија ђанке
SFX 735 дија ђанки
SFX 735 дија ђанку
SFX 735 дија ђанко
SFX 735 дија ђанком
SFX 735 дија ђанкама

SFX 736 Y 14
SFX 736 тска т
SFX 736 тска та
SFX 736 тска ту
SFX 736 тска том
SFX 736 тска ти
SFX 736 тска тима
SFX 736 тска те
SFX 736 тска тица
SFX 736 тска тице
SFX 736 тска тици
SFX 736 тска тицу
SFX 736 тска тицо
SFX 736 тска тицом
SFX 736 тска тицама

SFX 737 Y 16
SFX 737 в вац
SFX 737 в вца
SFX 737 в вцу
SFX 737 в вче
SFX 737 в вцем
SFX 737 в вци
SFX 737 в ваца
SFX 737 в вцима
SFX 737 в вце
SFX 737 в вка
SFX 737 в вке
SFX 737 в вки
SFX 737 в вку
SFX 737 в вко
SFX 737 в вком
SFX 737 в вкама

SFX 738 Y 14
SFX 738 ешка х
SFX 738 ешка ха
SFX 738 ешка ху
SFX 738 ешка хом
SFX 738 ешка си
SFX 738 ешка сима
SFX 738 ешка хе
SFX 738 ешка хиња
SFX 738 ешка хиње
SFX 738 ешка хињи
SFX 738 ешка хињу
SFX 738 ешка хињо
SFX 738 ешка хињом
SFX 738 ешка хињама

SFX 739 Y 16
SFX 739 бу уљанин
SFX 739 бу уљанина
SFX 739 бу уљанину
SFX 739 бу уљанине
SFX 739 бу уљанином
SFX 739 бу уљани
SFX 739 бу уљана
SFX 739 бу уљанима
SFX 739 бу уљане
SFX 739 бу уљанка
SFX 739 бу уљанке
SFX 739 бу уљанки
SFX 739 бу уљанку
SFX 739 бу уљанко
SFX 739 бу уљанком
SFX 739 бу уљанкама

SFX 740 Y 16
SFX 740 дска ђанин
SFX 740 дска ђанина
SFX 740 дска ђанину
SFX 740 дска ђанине
SFX 740 дска ђанином
SFX 740 дска ђани
SFX 740 дска ђана
SFX 740 дска ђанима
SFX 740 дска ђане
SFX 740 дска ђанка
SFX 740 дска ђанке
SFX 740 дска ђанки
SFX 740 дска ђанку
SFX 740 дска ђанко
SFX 740 дска ђанком
SFX 740 дска ђанкама

SFX 741 Y 16
SFX 741 ска ланђанин
SFX 741 ска ланђанина
SFX 741 ска ланђанину
SFX 741 ска ланђанине
SFX 741 ска ланђанином
SFX 741 ска ланђани
SFX 741 ска ланђана
SFX 741 ска ланђанима
SFX 741 ска ланђане
SFX 741 ска ланђанка
SFX 741 ска ланђанке
SFX 741 ска ланђанки
SFX 741 ска ланђанку
SFX 741 ска ланђанко
SFX 741 ска ланђанком
SFX 741 ска ланђанкама

SFX 742 Y 16
SFX 742 ија ац
SFX 742 ија ца
SFX 742 ија цу
SFX 742 ија че
SFX 742 ија цем
SFX 742 ија ци
SFX 742 ија аца
SFX 742 ија цима
SFX 742 ија це
SFX 742 ија киња
SFX 742 ија киње
SFX 742 ија кињи
SFX 742 ија кињу
SFX 742 ија кињо
SFX 742 ија кињом
SFX 742 ија кињама

SFX 743 Y 16
SFX 743 ја нац
SFX 743 ја нца
SFX 743 ја нцу
SFX 743 ја нче
SFX 743 ја нцем
SFX 743 ја нци
SFX 743 ја наца
SFX 743 ја нцима
SFX 743 ја нце
SFX 743 ја нка
SFX 743 ја нке
SFX 743 ја нки
SFX 743 ја нку
SFX 743 ја нко
SFX 743 ја нком
SFX 743 ја нкама

SFX 744 Y 13
SFX 744 и а
SFX 744 и е
SFX 744 и и
SFX 744 и им
SFX 744 и има
SFX 744 и их
SFX 744 и о
SFX 744 и ог
SFX 744 и ога
SFX 744 и ој
SFX 744 и ом
SFX 744 и оме
SFX 744 и у

SFX 745 Y 14
SFX 745 ни ан
SFX 745 ни на
SFX 745 ни не
SFX 745 ни ни
SFX 745 ни ним
SFX 745 ни нима
SFX 745 ни них
SFX 745 ни но
SFX 745 ни ног
SFX 745 ни нога
SFX 745 ни ној
SFX 745 ни ном
SFX 745 ни номе
SFX 745 ни ну

SFX 746 Y 14
SFX 746 н н
SFX 746 н на
SFX 746 н не
SFX 746 н ни
SFX 746 н ним
SFX 746 н нима
SFX 746 н них
SFX 746 н но
SFX 746 н ног
SFX 746 н нога
SFX 746 н ној
SFX 746 н ном
SFX 746 н номе
SFX 746 н ну

SFX 747 Y 14
SFX 747 т т
SFX 747 т та
SFX 747 т те
SFX 747 т ти
SFX 747 т тим
SFX 747 т тима
SFX 747 т тих
SFX 747 т то
SFX 747 т тог
SFX 747 т тога
SFX 747 т тој
SFX 747 т том
SFX 747 т томе
SFX 747 т ту

SFX 748 Y 14
SFX 748 в в
SFX 748 в ва
SFX 748 в ве
SFX 748 в ви
SFX 748 в вим
SFX 748 в вима
SFX 748 в вих
SFX 748 в во
SFX 748 в вог
SFX 748 в вога
SFX 748 в вој
SFX 748 в вом
SFX 748 в воме
SFX 748 в ву

SFX 749 Y 13
SFX 749 и а
SFX 749 и е
SFX 749 и ег
SFX 749 и ега
SFX 749 и ем
SFX 749 и ему
SFX 749 и и
SFX 749 и им
SFX 749 и има
SFX 749 и их
SFX 749 и ој
SFX 749 и ом
SFX 749 и у

SFX 750 Y 14
SFX 750 к к
SFX 750 к ка
SFX 750 к ке
SFX 750 к ки
SFX 750 к ким
SFX 750 к кима
SFX 750 к ких
SFX 750 к ко
SFX 750 к ког
SFX 750 к кога
SFX 750 к кој
SFX 750 к ком
SFX 750 к коме
SFX 750 к ку

SFX 751 Y 14
SFX 751 ђ ђ
SFX 751 ђ ђа
SFX 751 ђ ђе
SFX 751 ђ ђег
SFX 751 ђ ђега
SFX 751 ђ ђем
SFX 751 ђ ђему
SFX 751 ђ ђи
SFX 751 ђ ђим
SFX 751 ђ ђима
SFX 751 ђ ђих
SFX 751 ђ ђој
SFX 751 ђ ђом
SFX 751 ђ ђу

SFX 752 Y 14
SFX 752 ж ж
SFX 752 ж жа
SFX 752 ж же
SFX 752 ж жег
SFX 752 ж жега
SFX 752 ж жем
SFX 752 ж жему
SFX 752 ж жи
SFX 752 ж жим
SFX 752 ж жима
SFX 752 ж жих
SFX 752 ж жој
SFX 752 ж жом
SFX 752 ж жу

SFX 753 Y 14
SFX 753 тан тан
SFX 753 тан на
SFX 753 тан не
SFX 753 тан ни
SFX 753 тан ним
SFX 753 тан нима
SFX 753 тан них
SFX 753 тан но
SFX 753 тан ног
SFX 753 тан нога
SFX 753 тан ној
SFX 753 тан ном
SFX 753 тан номе
SFX 753 тан ну

SFX 754 Y 14
SFX 754 д д
SFX 754 д да
SFX 754 д де
SFX 754 д ди
SFX 754 д дим
SFX 754 д дима
SFX 754 д дих
SFX 754 д до
SFX 754 д дог
SFX 754 д дога
SFX 754 д дој
SFX 754 д дом
SFX 754 д доме
SFX 754 д ду

SFX 755 Y 14
SFX 755 г г
SFX 755 г га
SFX 755 г ге
SFX 755 г ги
SFX 755 г гим
SFX 755 г гима
SFX 755 г гих
SFX 755 г го
SFX 755 г гог
SFX 755 г гога
SFX 755 г гој
SFX 755 г гом
SFX 755 г гоме
SFX 755 г гу

SFX 756 Y 14
SFX 756 с с
SFX 756 с са
SFX 756 с се
SFX 756 с си
SFX 756 с сим
SFX 756 с сима
SFX 756 с сих
SFX 756 с со
SFX 756 с сог
SFX 756 с сога
SFX 756 с сој
SFX 756 с сом
SFX 756 с соме
SFX 756 с су

SFX 757 Y 14
SFX 757 п п
SFX 757 п па
SFX 757 п пе
SFX 757 п пи
SFX 757 п пим
SFX 757 п пима
SFX 757 п пих
SFX 757 п по
SFX 757 п пог
SFX 757 п пога
SFX 757 п пој
SFX 757 п пом
SFX 757 п поме
SFX 757 п пу

SFX 758 Y 14
SFX 758 б б
SFX 758 б ба
SFX 758 б бе
SFX 758 б би
SFX 758 б бим
SFX 758 б бима
SFX 758 б бих
SFX 758 б бо
SFX 758 б бог
SFX 758 б бога
SFX 758 б бој
SFX 758 б бом
SFX 758 б боме
SFX 758 б бу

SFX 759 Y 14
SFX 759 х х
SFX 759 х ха
SFX 759 х хе
SFX 759 х хи
SFX 759 х хим
SFX 759 х хима
SFX 759 х хих
SFX 759 х хо
SFX 759 х хог
SFX 759 х хога
SFX 759 х хој
SFX 759 х хом
SFX 759 х хоме
SFX 759 х ху

SFX 760 Y 14
SFX 760 л л
SFX 760 л ла
SFX 760 л ле
SFX 760 л ли
SFX 760 л лим
SFX 760 л лима
SFX 760 л лих
SFX 760 л ло
SFX 760 л лог
SFX 760 л лога
SFX 760 л лој
SFX 760 л лом
SFX 760 л ломе
SFX 760 л лу

SFX 761 Y 14
SFX 761 з з
SFX 761 з за
SFX 761 з зе
SFX 761 з зи
SFX 761 з зим
SFX 761 з зима
SFX 761 з зих
SFX 761 з зо
SFX 761 з зог
SFX 761 з зога
SFX 761 з зој
SFX 761 з зом
SFX 761 з зоме
SFX 761 з зу

SFX 762 Y 14
SFX 762 р р
SFX 762 р ра
SFX 762 р ре
SFX 762 р ри
SFX 762 р рим
SFX 762 р рима
SFX 762 р рих
SFX 762 р ро
SFX 762 р рог
SFX 762 р рога
SFX 762 р рој
SFX 762 р ром
SFX 762 р роме
SFX 762 р ру

SFX 763 Y 14
SFX 763 о о
SFX 763 о ла
SFX 763 о ле
SFX 763 о ли
SFX 763 о лим
SFX 763 о лима
SFX 763 о лих
SFX 763 о ло
SFX 763 о лог
SFX 763 о лога
SFX 763 о лој
SFX 763 о лом
SFX 763 о ломе
SFX 763 о лу

SFX 764 Y 14
SFX 764 ри ар
SFX 764 ри ра
SFX 764 ри ре
SFX 764 ри ри
SFX 764 ри рим
SFX 764 ри рима
SFX 764 ри рих
SFX 764 ри ро
SFX 764 ри рог
SFX 764 ри рога
SFX 764 ри рој
SFX 764 ри ром
SFX 764 ри роме
SFX 764 ри ру

SFX 765 Y 14
SFX 765 ж ж
SFX 765 ж жа
SFX 765 ж же
SFX 765 ж жи
SFX 765 ж жим
SFX 765 ж жима
SFX 765 ж жих
SFX 765 ж жо
SFX 765 ж жог
SFX 765 ж жога
SFX 765 ж жој
SFX 765 ж жом
SFX 765 ж жоме
SFX 765 ж жу

SFX 766 Y 14
SFX 766 зак зак
SFX 766 зак ска
SFX 766 зак ске
SFX 766 зак ски
SFX 766 зак ским
SFX 766 зак скима
SFX 766 зак ских
SFX 766 зак ско
SFX 766 зак ског
SFX 766 зак скога
SFX 766 зак ској
SFX 766 зак ском
SFX 766 зак скоме
SFX 766 зак ску

SFX 767 Y 14
SFX 767 дак дак
SFX 767 дак тка
SFX 767 дак тке
SFX 767 дак тки
SFX 767 дак тким
SFX 767 дак ткима
SFX 767 дак тких
SFX 767 дак тко
SFX 767 дак тког
SFX 767 дак ткога
SFX 767 дак ткој
SFX 767 дак тком
SFX 767 дак ткоме
SFX 767 дак тку

SFX 768 Y 14
SFX 768 ио ио
SFX 768 ио јела
SFX 768 ио јеле
SFX 768 ио јели
SFX 768 ио јелим
SFX 768 ио јелима
SFX 768 ио јелих
SFX 768 ио јело
SFX 768 ио јелог
SFX 768 ио јелога
SFX 768 ио јелој
SFX 768 ио јелом
SFX 768 ио јеломе
SFX 768 ио јелу

SFX 769 Y 14
SFX 769 ко ак
SFX 769 ко ка
SFX 769 ко ке
SFX 769 ко ки
SFX 769 ко ким
SFX 769 ко кима
SFX 769 ко ких
SFX 769 ко ко
SFX 769 ко ког
SFX 769 ко кога
SFX 769 ко кој
SFX 769 ко ком
SFX 769 ко коме
SFX 769 ко ку

SFX 770 Y 14
SFX 770 ао ао
SFX 770 ао ла
SFX 770 ао ле
SFX 770 ао ли
SFX 770 ао лим
SFX 770 ао лима
SFX 770 ао лих
SFX 770 ао ло
SFX 770 ао лог
SFX 770 ао лога
SFX 770 ао лој
SFX 770 ао лом
SFX 770 ао ломе
SFX 770 ао лу

SFX 771 Y 14
SFX 771 ћ ћ
SFX 771 ћ ћа
SFX 771 ћ ће
SFX 771 ћ ћег
SFX 771 ћ ћега
SFX 771 ћ ћем
SFX 771 ћ ћему
SFX 771 ћ ћи
SFX 771 ћ ћим
SFX 771 ћ ћима
SFX 771 ћ ћих
SFX 771 ћ ћој
SFX 771 ћ ћом
SFX 771 ћ ћу

SFX 772 Y 14
SFX 772 бак бак
SFX 772 бак пка
SFX 772 бак пке
SFX 772 бак пки
SFX 772 бак пким
SFX 772 бак пкима
SFX 772 бак пких
SFX 772 бак пко
SFX 772 бак пког
SFX 772 бак пкога
SFX 772 бак пкој
SFX 772 бак пком
SFX 772 бак пкоме
SFX 772 бак пку

SFX 773 Y 14
SFX 773 м м
SFX 773 м ма
SFX 773 м ме
SFX 773 м ми
SFX 773 м мим
SFX 773 м мима
SFX 773 м мих
SFX 773 м мо
SFX 773 м мог
SFX 773 м мога
SFX 773 м мој
SFX 773 м мом
SFX 773 м моме
SFX 773 м му

SFX 774 Y 14
SFX 774 о о
SFX 774 о ола
SFX 774 о оле
SFX 774 о оли
SFX 774 о олим
SFX 774 о олима
SFX 774 о олих
SFX 774 о оло
SFX 774 о олог
SFX 774 о олога
SFX 774 о олој
SFX 774 о олом
SFX 774 о оломе
SFX 774 о олу

SFX 775 Y 14
SFX 775 аљ аљ
SFX 775 аљ ља
SFX 775 аљ ље
SFX 775 аљ љег
SFX 775 аљ љега
SFX 775 аљ љем
SFX 775 аљ љему
SFX 775 аљ љи
SFX 775 аљ љим
SFX 775 аљ љима
SFX 775 аљ љих
SFX 775 аљ љој
SFX 775 аљ љом
SFX 775 аљ љу

SFX 776 Y 14
SFX 776 тао тао
SFX 776 тао ла
SFX 776 тао ле
SFX 776 тао ли
SFX 776 тао лим
SFX 776 тао лима
SFX 776 тао лих
SFX 776 тао ло
SFX 776 тао лог
SFX 776 тао лога
SFX 776 тао лој
SFX 776 тао лом
SFX 776 тао ломе
SFX 776 тао лу

SFX 777 Y 14
SFX 777 жак жак
SFX 777 жак шка
SFX 777 жак шке
SFX 777 жак шки
SFX 777 жак шким
SFX 777 жак шкима
SFX 777 жак шких
SFX 777 жак шко
SFX 777 жак шког
SFX 777 жак шкога
SFX 777 жак шкој
SFX 777 жак шком
SFX 777 жак шкоме
SFX 777 жак шку

SFX 778 Y 14
SFX 778 њ њ
SFX 778 њ ња
SFX 778 њ ње
SFX 778 њ њег
SFX 778 њ њега
SFX 778 њ њем
SFX 778 њ њему
SFX 778 њ њи
SFX 778 њ њим
SFX 778 њ њима
SFX 778 њ њих
SFX 778 њ њој
SFX 778 њ њом
SFX 778 њ њу

SFX 779 Y 14
SFX 779 њ њ
SFX 779 њ ња
SFX 779 њ ње
SFX 779 њ њи
SFX 779 њ њим
SFX 779 њ њима
SFX 779 њ њих
SFX 779 њ њо
SFX 779 њ њог
SFX 779 њ њога
SFX 779 њ њој
SFX 779 њ њом
SFX 779 њ њоме
SFX 779 њ њу

SFX 780 Y 14
SFX 780 ш ш
SFX 780 ш ша
SFX 780 ш ше
SFX 780 ш шег
SFX 780 ш шега
SFX 780 ш шем
SFX 780 ш шему
SFX 780 ш ши
SFX 780 ш шим
SFX 780 ш шима
SFX 780 ш ших
SFX 780 ш шој
SFX 780 ш шом
SFX 780 ш шу

SFX 781 Y 14
SFX 781 ав ав
SFX 781 ав ва
SFX 781 ав ве
SFX 781 ав ви
SFX 781 ав вим
SFX 781 ав вима
SFX 781 ав вих
SFX 781 ав во
SFX 781 ав вог
SFX 781 ав вога
SFX 781 ав вој
SFX 781 ав вом
SFX 781 ав воме
SFX 781 ав ву

SFX 782 Y 15
SFX 782 и а
SFX 782 и е
SFX 782 и и
SFX 782 и им
SFX 782 и има
SFX 782 и их
SFX 782 и о
SFX 782 и ог
SFX 782 и ога
SFX 782 и ег
SFX 782 и ој
SFX 782 и ом
SFX 782 и оме
SFX 782 и у
SFX 782 и ем

SFX 783 Y 12
SFX 783 и и
SFX 783 и а
SFX 783 и е
SFX 783 и им
SFX 783 и има
SFX 783 и их
SFX 783 и ег
SFX 783 и ега
SFX 783 и ој
SFX 783 и ом
SFX 783 и оме
SFX 783 и у

SFX 784 Y 1
SFX 784 р р

SFX 785 Y 26
SFX 785 н нчев
SFX 785 н нчевог
SFX 785 н нчевога
SFX 785 н нчевом
SFX 785 н нчевоме
SFX 785 н нчевим
SFX 785 н нчеви
SFX 785 н нчевих
SFX 785 н нчеве
SFX 785 н нчева
SFX 785 н нчевој
SFX 785 н нчеву
SFX 785 н нчево
SFX 785 н нкин
SFX 785 н нкиног
SFX 785 н нкинога
SFX 785 н нкином
SFX 785 н нкиноме
SFX 785 н нкиним
SFX 785 н нкини
SFX 785 н нкиних
SFX 785 н нкине
SFX 785 н нкина
SFX 785 н нкиној
SFX 785 н нкину
SFX 785 н нкино
